tr: Mühür damga tasarımı: Hayvan; Kaligrafi; Kültürel semboller; Dekoratif; Çiçek; Monogram; Mitolojik; Kişiselleştirilmiş; Geleneksel; Diğer
pt-BR: Formato do carimbo de selo: Animal; Caligrafia; Símbolos culturais; Decorativo; Floral; Monograma; Mitológico; Personalizado; Tradicional; Outro
vi: Thiết kế tem niêm phong: Động vật; Chữ viết đẹp; Biểu tượng văn hóa; Trang trí; Hoa cỏ; Chữ lồng; Thuộc thần thoại; Cá nhân hóa; Truyền thống; Khác
zh-CN: 印章设计: 动物; 书法; 文化符号; 装饰性; 花型; 字母组合; 神话的; 个性化; 传统; 其他
cs: Design pečetního razítka: Zvíře; Kaligrafie; Kulturní symboly; Dekorativní; Květinový; Monogram; Mytologický; Personalizovaný; Tradiční; Jiné
es: Diseño de sello: Animal; Caligrafía; Símbolos culturales; Decorativo; Floral; Monograma; Mitológico; Personalizado; Traditional; Otros
bg-BG: Дизайн на печат: Животно; Калиграфия; Културни символи; Декоративен; Флорален; Монограм; Митологичен; Персонализиран; Традиционен; Други
fr: Modèle de tampon de scellement: Animal; Calligraphie; Symboles culturels; Décoratif; Floral; Monogramme; Mythologique; Personnalisé; Traditionnel; Autre
en: Seal stamp design: Animal; Calligraphy; Cultural symbols; Decorative; Floral; Monogram; Mythological; Personalized; Traditional; Other
lt-LT: Antspaudo dizainas: Gyvūnas; Kaligrafija; Kultūriniai simboliai; Dekoratyvinis; Gėlės; Monograma; Mitologinis; Personalizuotas; Tradicinis; Kita
sk-SK: Dizajn pečiatky/pečate: Zviera; Kaligrafia; Kultúrne symboly; Dekoratívny; Kvetinový; Monogram; Mytologický; Personalizovaný; Tradičný; Iné
ko: 씰 도장 디자인: 동물; 캘리그라피; 문화적 상징; 장식적인; 꽃; 모노그램; 신화; 맞춤화된; 전통; 기타
nl: Ontwerp zegelstempel: Dier; Kalligrafie; Culturele symbolen; Decoratief; Gebloemd; Monogram; Mythologisch; Gepersonaliseerd; Traditioneel; Andere
ja: シーリングスタンプの種類: 動物; カリグラフィー; 文化的シンボル; 装飾; フローラル; モノグラム; 神話的; パーソナライズ; 従来の; その他
hu: Pecsétbélyegző kialakítása: Állat; Kalligráfia; Kulturális szimbólumok; Díszítő; Virág; Monogram; Mitológiai; Személyre szabott; Hagyományos; Egyéb
sl-SI: Oblika štampiljke: Žival; Kaligrafija; Kulturni simboli; Dekorativna; Cvetlična; Monogram; Mitološka; Personalizirana; Tradicionalno; Drugo
pl: Projekt pieczęci: Zwierzęcy; Kaligrafia; Symbole kulturowe; Dekoracyjny; Kwiatowy; Monogram; Mitologiczny; Personalizowane; Tradycyjny; Inne
sv: Sigillstämpeldesign: Djur; Kalligrafi; Kulturella symboler; Dekorativ; Blommig; Monogram; Mytologisk; Personlig; Traditionell; Övrigt
hr-HR: Dizajn pečata: Životinja; Kaligrafija; Kulturni simboli; Ukrasni; Cvjetni; Monogram; Mitološki; Personalizirani; Tradicionalni; Ostalo
da: Seglstempeldesign: Dyr; Kalligrafi; Kulturelle symboler; Dekorativ; Blomster; Monogram; Mytologisk; Personliggjort; Traditionel; Andet
it: Design del timbro con sigillo: Animale; Calligrafia; Simboli culturali; Decorativo; Floreale; Monogramma; Mitologico; Personalizzato; Tradizionale; Altro
ru: Конструкция штампа: Животное; Каллиграфия; Культурные символы; Декоративный; Цветы; Монограмма; Мифология; Персонализированный; Традиционный; Другое
pt-PT: Design de carimbo de selo: Animal; Caligrafia; Símbolos culturais; Decorativo; Floral; Monograma; Mitológico; Personalizado; Tradicional; Outro
el: Σχέδιο σφραγίδας: Ζώο; Καλλιγραφία; Πολιτιστικά σύμβολα; Διακοσμητικό; Φλοράλ; Μονόγραμμα; Μυθολογική; Εξατομικευμένη; Παραδοσιακή; Άλλο
th: การออกแบบตราประทับ: สัตว์; การเขียนพู่กัน; สัญลักษณ์ของวัฒนธรรมต่างๆ; ตกแต่ง; ลายดอก; โมโนแกรม; เกี่ยวกับตำนาน; ส่วนบุคคล; แบบดั้งเดิม; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Design ștampilă sigiliu: Animal; Caligrafie; Simboluri culturale; Decorativ; Floral; Monogramă; Mitologic; Personalizat; Tradițional; Altele
fi: Sinettileiman muotoilu: Eläin; Kalligrafia; Kulttuurilliset symbolit; Koristeellinen; Kukikas; Monogrammi; Mytologinen; Personoitu; Perinteinen; Muu
zh-TW: 封蠟章設計: 動物; 書法墨水; 文化符號; 裝飾; 花卉; 字母組合; 神話; 個人化; 傳統的; 其他
de: Design des Siegelstempels: Tier; Kalligraphie; Kulturelle Symbole; Dekorativ; Blumenmuster; Monogramm; Mythologisch; Personalisiert; Traditionell; Sonstiges
nb: Utforming av seglstempel: Dyr; Kalligrafi; Kulturelle symboler; Dekorativ; Blomster; Monogram; Mytologisk; Personlig tilpasset; Tradisjonell; Annet